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DTC P2714 Pressure Control Solenoid ”D” Performance
(Shift Solenoid Valve SLT)

SYSTEM DESCRIPTION
The Engine and ECT ECU calculates the shifting condition by
using the signals from the vehicle speed sensor, throttle posi-
tion sensor, etc.. And compares this result with the signal that
Engine and ECT ECU sends t o SLT t o det ect m echanical
trouble of the shift solenoid valve SLT, valve body, torque con-
verter and automatic transmission assembly (clutch, brake or
gear etc.).

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P2714

Engine and ECT ECU detects a malfunction on SLT (ON side)
according to the revolution difference of the turbine and the
output shaft, and also by the oil pressure. (2−trip detection
logic)

S Shift solenoid valve SLT is stuck open or closed
S Valve body blocked up or stuck
S Automatic transmission assembly

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check shift solenoid valve SLT operation.

PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Remove the shift solenoid valve SLT.
CHECK:
(a) Measure the resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of so-

lenoid connector.
Standard: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

(b) Connect the positive (+) lead with an 21 W bulb to terminal
2 of solenoid connector and negative (−) lead to terminal
1 of the solenoid valve connector, then check the move-
ment of the valve.
Standard: Solenoid sounds operation noise.

OK:
Standard

NG Replace the shift solenoid valve SLT
(See page AT−8) .

OK
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2 Check valve body (See page DI−26).

NG Replace the valve body (See page AT−8) .

OK

Repair or replace transmission (See page
AT−31).


